Illinois, session 104th, SB2443.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-115 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-115)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-115)7    Sec. 6-115. Expiration of driver's license. 8    (a) Except as provided elsewhere in this Section, every 9driver's license issued under the provisions of this Code 10shall expire 4 years from the date of its issuance, or at such 11later date, as the Secretary of State may by proper rule and 12regulation designate, not to exceed 12 calendar months; in the 13event that an applicant for renewal of a driver's license 14fails to apply prior to the expiration date of the previous 15driver's license, the renewal driver's license shall expire 4 16years from the expiration date of the previous driver's 17license, or at such later date as the Secretary of State may by 18proper rule and regulation designate, not to exceed 12 19calendar months.20    The Secretary of State may, however, issue to a person not 21previously licensed as a driver in Illinois a driver's license 22which will expire not less than 4 years nor more than 5 years 23from date of issuance, except as provided elsewhere in this   SB2443- 2 -LRB104 08423 LNS 18475 b1Section.2    (a-3) Beginning no later than July 1, 2027, the Secretary 3shall offer to qualified applicants the option to be issued an 48-year driver's license. The Secretary shall submit proposed 5rules to implement this subsection to the Joint Committee on 6Administrative Rules no later than January 1, 2027. 7    (a-5) Every driver's license issued under this Code to an 8applicant who is not a United States citizen or permanent 9resident, or an individual who has an approved application for 10asylum in the United States or has entered the United States in 11refugee status, shall expire on whichever is the earlier date 12of the following:13        (1) as provided under subsection (a), (f), (g), or (i) 14    of this Section;15        (2) on the date the applicant's authorized stay in the 16    United States terminates; or 17        (3) if the applicant's authorized stay is indefinite 18    and the applicant is applying for a Limited Term REAL ID 19    compliant driver's license, one year from the date of 20    issuance of the license.21    (a-10) Every REAL ID compliant driver's license issued 22under this Code to an applicant who is not a United States 23citizen or permanent resident, or an individual who has an 24approved application for asylum in the United States or has 25entered the United States in refugee status, shall be marked 26"Limited Term".   SB2443- 3 -LRB104 08423 LNS 18475 b1    (b) Before the expiration of a driver's license, except 2those licenses expiring on the individual's 21st birthday, or 33 months after the individual's 21st birthday, the holder 4thereof may apply for a renewal thereof, subject to all the 5provisions of Section 6-103, and the Secretary of State may 6require an examination of the applicant. A licensee whose 7driver's license expires on his 21st birthday, or 3 months 8after his 21st birthday, may not apply for a renewal of his 9driving privileges until he reaches the age of 21.10    (c) The Secretary of State shall, 30 days prior to the 11expiration of a driver's license, forward to each person whose 12license is to expire a notification of the expiration of said 13license which may be presented at the time of renewal of said 14license.15    There may be included with such notification information 16explaining the anatomical gift and Emergency Medical 17Information Card provisions of Section 6-110. The format and 18text of such information shall be prescribed by the Secretary.19    There shall be included with such notification, for a 20period of 4 years beginning January 1, 2000 information 21regarding the Illinois Adoption Registry and Medical 22Information Exchange established in Section 18.1 of the 23Adoption Act.24    (d) The Secretary may defer the expiration of the driver's 25license of a licensee, or of a spouse or , and dependent 26children who are living with such licensee while on active   SB2443- 4 -LRB104 08423 LNS 18475 b1duty, serving in the Armed Forces of the United States outside 2of the State of Illinois for any length of time, in the 3Secretary's discretion, that does not exceed 6 months 4following the discharge of the licensee from the Armed Forces 5of the United States or within 90 days after reestablishing 6residence within the State, whichever is sooner , and 120 days 7thereafter, upon such terms and conditions as the Secretary 8may prescribe.9    (d-5) The Secretary may defer the expiration of the 10driver's license of a licensee, or of a spouse or dependent 11children living with the licensee, serving as a civilian 12employee of the United States Armed Forces or the United 13States Department of Defense, outside of the State of 14Illinois, and 120 days thereafter, upon such terms and 15conditions as the Secretary may prescribe. 16    (e) The Secretary of State may decline to process a 17renewal of a driver's license of any person who has not paid 18any fee or tax due under this Code and is not paid upon 19reasonable notice and demand.20    (f) The Secretary shall provide that each original or 21renewal driver's license issued to a licensee under 21 years 22of age shall expire 3 months after the licensee's 21st 23birthday. Persons whose current driver's licenses expire on 24their 21st birthday on or after January 1, 1986 shall not renew 25their driver's license before their 21st birthday, and their 26current driver's license will be extended for an additional   SB2443- 5 -LRB104 08423 LNS 18475 b1term of 3 months beyond their 21st birthday. Thereafter, the 2expiration and term of the driver's license shall be governed 3by subsection (a) hereof.4    (g) The Secretary shall provide that each original or 5renewal driver's license issued to a licensee 81 years of age 6through age 86 shall expire 2 years from the date of issuance, 7or at such later date as the Secretary may by rule and 8regulation designate, not to exceed an additional 12 calendar 9months. The Secretary shall also provide that each original or 10renewal driver's license issued to a licensee 87 years of age 11or older shall expire 12 months from the date of issuance, or 12at such later date as the Secretary may by rule and regulation 13designate, not to exceed an additional 12 calendar months.14    (h) The Secretary of State shall provide that each special 15restricted driver's license issued under subsection (g) of 16Section 6-113 of this Code shall expire 12 months from the date 17of issuance. The Secretary shall adopt rules defining renewal 18requirements.19    (i) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 20driver's license issued to a person convicted of a sex offense 21as defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Act 22shall expire 12 months from the date of issuance or at such 23date as the Secretary may by rule designate, not to exceed an 24additional 12 calendar months. The Secretary may adopt rules 25defining renewal requirements. 26(Source: P.A. 102-659, eff. 1-1-22; 103-872, eff. 1-1-25.)